New York, session 2025-2026, A9314.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 7-202 of the election law, as 2 added by chapter 181 of the laws of 2005, is amended and a new subdivi- 3 sion 5 is added to read as follows: 4 4. Local boards of elections which obtain voting machines pursuant to 5 this chapter [may determine to] shall purchase [direct recording elec- 6 tronic machines or] optical scan machines that tabulate paper ballots 7 marked by hand that comply with section 7-104 of this article, and 8 ballot marking devices that comply with subdivision two of this section 9 but do not tabulate votes, in conformance with the requirements of this 10 chapter. 11 5. Local boards of elections must provide every voter at every polling 12 place, both of the following options: 13 (a) to hand mark a paper ballot that complies with section 7-104 of 14 this article; or 15 (b) to use a ballot marking device that does not tabulate votes to 16 mark such paper ballot. 17 § 2. Voting machines and systems purchased prior to the effective date 18 of this act may continue to be used and maintained if they are designed 19 and constructed to utilize paper ballots that comply with section 7-104 20 of the election law. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14049-01-5